Utah statutes.
30-5a-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Parent" means a biological or adoptive parent.

(2)  "Person other than a parent" means a person related to the child by marriage or blood, including:

(a)  siblings;

(b)  aunts;

(c)  uncles;

(d)  grandparents; or

(e)  current or former step-parents, or any of the persons in Subsections (2)(a) through (d) in a step relationship to the child.

